Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 2

Interchange

17-2-201. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to ensure that existing judicial resources are utilized to the fullest extent and that no additional judicial resources are created until uniform caseload statistics are developed that will establish a priority for the need for additional judges.

Acts 1997, ch. 430, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-2-201 (Code 1858, § 3916 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 2); Shan., § 5709; mod. Code 1932, § 9895; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-207), concerning interchange by circuit judges, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 430, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § VII.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.11.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judges, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Martin v. Dowling, 204 Tenn. 34, 315 S.W.2d 397, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 243 (1958); Crawford v. Gilpatrick, 646 S.W.2d 433, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 608 (Tenn. 1983); Ready Mix, USA, LLC v. Jefferson County, 380 S.W.3d 52, 2012 Tenn. LEXIS 621 (Tenn. Aug. 30, 2012).

17-2-202. Duty to interchange.

Each state trial court judge has an affirmative duty to interchange if:

A judge has died or is unable to hold court;

Two (2) or more judges have agreed to a mutually convenient interchange; or

[Deleted by 2012 amendment.]

The chief justice of the supreme court has assigned by order a judge to another court pursuant to Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11.

A failure to comply with an interchange order of the supreme court is a judicial offense under § 17-5-301(j)(1)(B). The chief justice shall report such failure to comply immediately to the presiding judge of the board of judicial conduct. The clerk of the supreme court shall maintain such reports for public inspection.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 105, § 3; Shan., § 5713; mod. Code 1932, § 9899; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-208; Acts 1997, ch. 430, § 1; 2012, ch. 789, § 5; 2012, ch. 819, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 5 provided that, in order to carry out its functions, duties, and responsibilities maintained under the provisions of the act, which amended subsection (b), the court of the judiciary shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under title 17 prior to enactment of the act, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the court of the judiciary, the board of judicial conduct is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the court of the judiciary in order to carry out its responsibilities established this chapter. The board of judicial conduct also is expressly authorized to continue any preliminary investigations, full investigations, and/or trials scheduled or in progress by the court of the judiciary at the time of termination of the court of the judiciary. This authorization includes the right to use any evidence obtained or taken by the court of the judiciary without the need to obtain again or retake any such evidence, including, but not limited to, prior issued subpoenas.

Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 6 provided that: (a) All rules of the court of the judiciary in effect on July 1, 2012, shall remain in full force and effect as rules of the board of judicial conduct until modified or repealed by the board of judicial conduct.

The initial rules adopted by the board of judicial conduct shall serve as the temporary rules of the board. The temporary rules shall remain in effect until such time as approved or not approved by the general assembly, with the board's chairperson presenting the rules, during the first session of the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly using the same procedure set out in §16-3-404 for rules of court. If approved, the rules shall become the permanent rules of the board. All subsequent modifications or additions to such rules shall be approved by the general assembly in accordance with the procedures set forth in §16-3-404.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment by ch. 789 deleted (a)(3) which read: “The judge is incompetent under §17-2-101;”.

The 2012 amendment by ch. 819 substituted “board of judicial conduct” for “court of the judiciary” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 789, § 7. April 23, 2012.

Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 8. July 1, 2012; provided, that, for the purposes of appointing the members of the board of judicial conduct created by the act, the act shall take effect April 25, 2012.

Cross-References. Change of venue in chancery, §21-1-501.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § VII.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 624.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Attorney General Opinions. A private act proposing to authorize a general sessions judge to interchange with a chancellor in a particular county should articulate the reasons why such authority is necessary or convenient to the operation of the judicial system in the affected county, as such an act would violate the constitution absent a rational basis for suspending the general law with regard to interchange in the particular county, OAG 02-074 (6/12/02).

Cited: State v. Brown, 53 S.W.3d 264, 2000 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 962 (Tenn. Crim. App. 2000); State Dep't of Children's Servs. v. A.M.H., 198 S.W.3d 757, 2006 Tenn. App. LEXIS 156 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2006); Ready Mix, USA, LLC v. Jefferson County, 380 S.W.3d 52, 2012 Tenn. LEXIS 621 (Tenn. Aug. 30, 2012).

17-2-203 — 17-2-205. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§17-2-203 —17-2-205 (Code 1858, § 3917 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 2); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 105, § 2; Acts 1870-1871, ch. 34, § 1; Shan., §§ 5710, 5712, 5714; Code 1932, §§ 9896, 9898, 9900; Acts 1971, ch. 344, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 17-209 — 17-211), concerning interchange by chancellors and criminal court judges, were repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 430, § 1.

17-2-206. Powers on interchange.

In all such cases, the judge or chancellor holding court in the circuit or division of another, shall have the same power and jurisdiction as the judge or chancellor in whose place the judge or chancellor is acting.

Code 1858, § 3918 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 20, § 2); Shan., § 5711; Code 1932, § 9897; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-212.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: In re Estate of Nelson, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 147 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 22, 2007); Jackson v. Lanphere, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 441 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 12, 2011).

17-2-207. Interchange by special judges.

A person appointed and commissioned under §§17-2-116 and17-2-117 shall have the same power to interchange with other judges and chancellors as the regular official in whose place the person is appointed and commissioned to act.

Code 1858, § 3929; Shan., § 5727; Code 1932, § 9916; Acts 1959, ch. 150, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 17-224.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

17-2-208. Interchange of general sessions and juvenile court judges.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, judges of courts of general sessions and juvenile courts may interchange with each other whenever causes exist making an interchange necessary or for mutual convenience. The interchanging judge shall not be required to be a resident of the county of the judge for whom such judge is sitting, but must otherwise possess the same qualifications as such judge.

Acts 1973, ch. 41, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-229; Acts 1997, ch. 473, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. Interchange by judges from different counties improper, OAG 96-114 (9/5/96).

A private act proposing to authorize a general sessions judge to interchange with a chancellor in a particular county should articulate the reasons why such authority is necessary or convenient to the operation of the judicial system in the affected county, as such an act would violate the constitution absent a rational basis for suspending the general law with regard to interchange in the particular county, OAG 02-074 (6/12/02).

Cited: Crawford v. Gilpatrick, 646 S.W.2d 433, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 608 (Tenn. 1983); Jackson v. Lanphere, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 441 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 12, 2011).

17-2-209. Interchange in certain divorce actions.

In counties with a population of over seven hundred thousand (700,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the general sessions judges may sit by interchange as a circuit court judge or chancellor for the exclusive purpose of hearing and deciding uncontested and irreconcilable differences in divorce cases.

When the circuit court clerk or clerk and master determines that a pending divorce action is uncontested as to all material facts or issues, or when the clerk determines that the ground relied upon in a pending divorce action is irreconcilable differences between the parties pursuant to § 36-4-101, the clerk may so certify such determinations to the circuit court judge or chancellor.

The circuit court judge or chancellor may designate that a general sessions judge sit by interchange to hear and decide any divorce action determined by the clerk to be uncontested or based upon irreconcilable differences. Any decree entered by a general sessions judge sitting by interchange pursuant to this section shall be considered a decree of the circuit or chancery court and any petitions for modification of the decree shall be filed in the circuit or chancery court. All appeals from the decision of a general sessions judge sitting by interchange pursuant to this section shall be taken in the same manner as if the circuit judge or chancellor rendered the decision.

Acts 1982, ch. 696, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Divorce and Alimony, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. A private act proposing to authorize a general sessions judge to interchange with a chancellor in a particular county should articulate the reasons why such authority is necessary or convenient to the operation of the judicial system in the affected county, as such an act would violate the constitution absent a rational basis for suspending the general law with regard to interchange in the particular county, OAG 02-074 (6/12/02).

General sessions court judges may not sit by interchange for circuit court judges or chancellors in the absence of a private act specifically granting such interchange authority, except "for the exclusive purpose of hearing and deciding uncontested and irreconcilable differences in divorce cases" in counties with a population over 700,000. The General Assembly, by private act, may authorize general sessions judges to interchange with circuit court judges and chancellors in a particular county, as long as the General Assembly has a rational basis for granting interchange authority in that county. OAG 19-14, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (9/9/2019).

Cited: Jackson v. Lanphere, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 441 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 12, 2011).